Florida, session 2026, SB1606.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 16 733.303, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 17 733.303âPersons not qualified.â 18 (1)âA person is not qualified to act as a personal 19 representative if the person: 20 (a)1.âHas been convicted of a felony, unless the person is 21 a parent, spouse, child, or grandchild of the decedent who is 22 not currently incarcerated and there are no other family members 23 of the same degree of consanguinity to serve. 24 2.âIf a family member of a decedent petitions to be 25 appointed as personal representative and has a felony 26 conviction, the court must make the determination to grant the 27 petition pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of the State Constitution. In 28 making its determination, the court shall consider the following 29 criteria to evaluate the petitionerâs ability to serve as 30 personal representative: 31 a.âWhether the decedent was the victim of the felony for 32 which the petitioner was convicted. 33 b.âWhether the petitioner was convicted for a violation of 34 chapters 812 or 817 or a crime involving dishonesty, theft, or 35 fraud. 36 c.âThe nature and circumstances of the offense committed by 37 the petitioner. 38 d.âThe timing of the offense, including the petitionerâs 39 age at the time of the offense and, if applicable, the length of 40 time since the petitioner was released from incarceration. 41 e.âAny concerns of interested parties. 42 f.âEvidence of the petitionerâs rehabilitation. 43 g.âWhether the petitionerâs civil rights have been 44 restored. 45 h.âThe relationship of the decedent and petitioner at the 46 time of the decedentâs death and for at least 2 years prior. 47 3.âThe court may use any of the criteria under subparagraph 48 2. when determining if a petition will be granted. 49 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.